Maryland, session 2026, HB0127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–305.
(J) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–105 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL GRANT, BY
LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON A DWELLING LOCATED IN THE COUNTY THAT IS OWNED
BY A PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0127*

HOUSE BILL 127
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE,
BY LAW, FOR:
(I) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(III) PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND UNIFORM
PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE CREDIT; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBSECTION.
(K) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–105 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL GRANT, BY
LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON A DWELLING LOCATED IN THE COUNTY THAT IS OWNED
BY AN EMPLOYEE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM OF BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE,
BY LAW, FOR:
(I) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(III) PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND UNIFORM
PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE CREDIT; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.